District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Family Re-Housing Stabilization Program Protection Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 7(b)(4)(B) of the Homeless Services Reform Act, effective October 22,
2005 (D.C. Law 16-35; D.C. Official Code § 4-753.01(b)(4)(B)), is amended as follows:
(a) The existing text is designated as sub-subparagraph (i).
(b) New sub-subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) are added to read as follows:
“(ii) Notwithstanding any other law; provided, that funding
is available within the Family Re-Housing Stabilization Program (“FRSP”) to implement this sub-
subparagraph and sub-subparagraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subparagraph, the Department, or the
Department’s designee, shall consider requests for FRSP assistance extending past 12 months if:
“(I) The participant has requested an extension in
writing;
“(II) The participant has made a good faith effort
towards the achievement of goals set forth in an individualized plan with the aim of a targeted
progression toward exit from the supports of FRSP, as observed by a service provider at consistent
intervals, but cannot yet sustain housing stability independently of FRSP; and
“(III) The participant has not yet been approved for
permanently affordable housing.
“(iii) When making a determination of whether to grant a
participant in FRSP an extension beyond 12 months, the Department, or the Department's
designee, shall:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(I) Consider the totality of the circumstances; and
“(II) Grant extensions of time in increments not
greater than 6 months, with formal reviews every 3 months to ensure that participants are given
the support necessary to exit FRSP with stable housing.
“(iv) If a requested extension of FRSP assistance by a
participant is denied, the participant shall be given 30 days written notice prior to the final subsidy
payment explicitly setting forth the reason for the denial of additional assistance and informing the
participant that the participant has a right to:
“(I) Appeal the determination through a fair
hearing and administrative review, including deadlines for requesting an appeal; and
“(II) The continuation of FRSP services
pending the outcome of any fair hearing requested within 15 days of receipt of a written notice of
a termination.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of July 10, 2025.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3